Maryland, session 2026, SB0635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–221.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, before entering
a leased premises, a landlord shall:
(i) Provide written notice to the tenant of the landlord’s intent to
enter in accordance with subsection (c) of this section; and
(ii) Enter only between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and 7:00 p.m. Monday
through Saturday, or another time agreed on, in writing, by the tenant.
(2) A landlord may enter the leased premises without providing notice
under this subsection [in]:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0635*

SENATE BILL 635
(I) IN the event of an emergency to ensure the imminent protection
or preservation of the property, the imminent protection and safety of any occupants, or the
health, safety, and welfare of other tenants and staff; OR
(II) TO COMPLETE A REPAIR OR PERFORM MAINTENANCE
REQUESTED IN WRITING BY THE TENANT:
1. WITHIN 7 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE
TENANT SUBMITTED THE WRITTEN REQUEST; OR
2. WHILE THE REPAIR IS IN PROGRESS IF THE
LANDLORD IS MAKING A REASONABLE EFFORT TO COMPLETE THE REPAIR IN A
TIMELY MANNER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.